District of Columbia statutes.
2-531

Public policy.

The public policy of the District of Columbia is that all persons are entitled to full and complete information regarding the affairs of government and the official acts of those who represent them as public officials and employees. To that end, provisions of this subchapter shall be construed with the view toward expansion of public access and the minimization of costs and time delays to persons requesting information.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title II, § 201
as added Mar. 25, 1977, D.C. Law 1-96, § 2, 23 DCR 9532b
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-283, § 3(a), 48 DCR 1917
Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority, application of Freedom of Information Act to members and activities of authority, see § 47-391.08.
Restraints of trade, civil investigative demand, exemption from provisions of Freedom of Information Act, see § 28-4505.
This section is referenced in § 1-309.10, § 2-354.17, § 2-1208.04, § 7-2271.05, § 28-4505, § 31-5031.17, § 38-1802.14, § 47-391.08, and § 48-853.05.
1981 Ed., § 1-1521.
1973 Ed., § 1-1521.
D.C. Law 13-283, in the first sentence, substituted “The” for “Generally, the”.
Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 1-96, the “Freedom of Information Act of 1976.”, see Mayor’s Order 91-36, March 7, 1991.

Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) Committee, see Mayor’s Order 2001-30, February 27, 2001 ( 48 DCR 2380).

Access to Email Traffic of District Government Employees, see Mayor’s Order 2003-164, November 21, 2003 ( 50 DCR 10604).

Designation of Freedom of Information (FOIA) Officer in Each Subordinate Agency, Attendance at FOIA Committee Training, Listing of Subordinate Agency FOIA Officers on Agency Website and Agency Assistance with FOIA Requests, see Mayor’s Order 2004-106, June 29, 2004 ( 51 DCR 7138).

Free Flow of Information Act of 1992: See §§ 16-4701 to 16-4704.